Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.182

Farmer.

"Farmer" means any person, firm, partnership or corporation engaged in farming. If a person, firm, partnership or corporation is engaged in activities in addition to that of farming, the definition shall only apply to that portion of the activity that is defined as farming in RCW 46.04.183.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 281 s 58.]